Hawaii, session 2026, GM1285.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that access.to
affordable, right-sized credit is essential for small business
r
formation, survival, and expansion in the State's geographically
isolated and high-cost economy. Small businesses, particularly
startups, sole proprietors, and very small employers, depend on
smaller-dollar loans to finance working capital, equipment,
inventory, leasehold improvements, and early operating expenses.
The legislature further finds that publicly available data
from the United States Small Business Administration (SBA)
indicates that a substantial share of SBA-backed loans made to
Hawaii businesses are originated by lenders headquartered
outside the State, rather than by Hawaii-based banks and
community lenders. This pattern reflects limited local capacity
for smaller-dollar lending and constrained lender risk tolerance
in the absence of credit enhancement tools.
The legislature additionally finds that when small business
credit is primarily originated by out-of-state lenders, interest
2026-3314 HB2583 CDl HMSO
■WniHiUlllHilM

Page 2 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
payments, fees, and servicing revenues are more likely to leave
the State, reducing the local economic multiplier effect that
would otherwise occur if those dollars were retained and
reinvested through local financial institutions. Over time,
this dynamic contributes to capital leakage from the State and
weakens the State's locally rooted small business financing
ecosystem.
The legislature also finds that limited availability of
locally delivered micro-loans increases financial risk for
Hawaii entrepreneurs. In the absence of sufficient
micro-lending capacity among local lenders, small businesses may
be forced to rely on higher-cost or riskier credit products,
accept less favorable loan terms, or delay business formation,
expansion, and hiring altogether. These constraints
disproportionately affect early-stage businesses, rural
communities, and neighbor islands.
The legislature recognizes that other states have
successfully addressed similar capital access challenges through
state-supported loan loss reserve and credit enhancement
programs that share risk with lenders while leveraging private
capital. In particular:
2026-3314 HB2583 CDl HMSO
■iiiiuiiiiiiiiiiaiio

Page 3
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(1) California operates a long-standing small business
capital access program that establishes loan loss
reserve accounts funded by borrower and lender
contributions matched by the state, enabling lenders
to extend credit to small businesses that would not
otherwise qualify on comparable terms;
(2) Colorado administers a credit reserve program that
uses borrower fees and state matching contributions to
capitalize lender-held reserve accounts that absorb
first losses on enrolled loans, expanding access to
smaller-dollar loans while preserving prudent
underwriting standards and voluntary participation;
and
(3) Florida operates a state capital access program that
similarly establishes loan loss reserve accounts
through borrower and lender contributions matched by
the state,
demonstrating that credit enhancement models can be successfully
deployed in tourism-driven, small-business-dominated economies
with significant seasonal cash-flow variability, conditions that
closely mirror Hawaii's economic structure.
2026-3314 HB2583 CDl HMSO
iiiiiiiiNiiimiiiiiiii

Page 4 ■ ■ 2583
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
The legislature further finds that these programs are
effective because they are market-based, voluntary, and fiscally
disciplined, leveraging private lending rather than replacing it
and expanding access to credit without imposing mandates on
lenders.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to strengthen the
State's small business financing ecosystem by establishing a
state-supported micro-lending credit enhancement program that
expands local lending capacity, retains more financial activity
within the State, reduces reliance on higher-risk borrowing
options, and improves access to affordable, appropriately sized
capital for entrepreneurs in the State.
SECTION 2. The Hawaii Revised Statutes is amended by
adding a new chapter to be appropriately designated and to read
as follows:
"CHAPTER
HAWAII MICRO-LENDING CREDIT ENHANCEMENT PROGRAM
§ -1 Definitions. As used in this chapter:
"Credit enhancement" means a loan loss reserve, first-loss
reserve, partial guarantee, or other risk-sharing mechanism
2026-3314 HB2583 CDl HMSO

Page 5
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
approved by the department to encourage lending that would not
otherwise occur on comparable terms,
"Department" means the department of business, economic
development, and tourism.
"Eligible lender" means a state- or federally-chartered
bank, savings bank, credit union, certified community
development financial institution, or other financing entity
approved by the department that originates and services business
loans in the State.
"Micro-loan" has the same meaning as "microloan" in title
13 Code of Federal Regulations section 120.701.
"Program" means the Hawaii micro-lending credit enhancement
program established pursuant to this chapter.
"Qualified borrower" means a for-profit small business
that:
(1) Is authorized to do business in the State;
(2) Maintains its primary operations in the State; and
(3) Meets size standards as determined by the department
by rule.
§ -2 Hawaii micro-lending credit enhancement program;
established. (a) There is established within the department
2026-3314 HB2583 CDl HMSO
■iinniuiiniiMiiiiii

Page 6
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
the Hawaii micro-lending credit enhancement program to encourage
eligible lenders to increase the availability of micro-loans to
qualified borrowers through state-supported credit enhancement.
(b) Lender and borrower participation in the program shall
be voluntary. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to
require an eligible lender to make any loan or alter prudent
underwriting standards.
§ -3 Credit enhancement mechanisms; loan loss reserves.
(a) The department may provide credit enhancement through one
or more of the following mechanisms:
(1) Loan loss reserve accounts established with
participating eligible lenders;
(2) First-loss reserve arrangements that absorb a portion
of initial losses on qualified micro-loans; or
(3) Other risk-sharing mechanisms approved by the
department that are consistent with recognized state
small business credit enhancement practices.
(b) The department may require, as a condition of
participation in the program, that:
2026-3314 HB2583 GDI HMSO 6
llliHMaillMIAliH

Page 7 ■H ■ .B. iNk ■ O. 2583
HD1
C.D. 1
(1) A qualified borrower pay a fee of up to one per cent
of the micro-loan principal, which shall be deposited
into a lender-held loan loss reserve account; and
(2) The program provide a matching contribution, in an
amount determined by the department, deposited into
the same reserve account.
(c) Funds in a loan loss reserve account shall be used
solely to cover losses on qualified micro-loans in accordance
with program guidelines established by the department.
§ -4 Eligible uses; exclusions. (a) Qualified
micro-loans may be used for standard business purposes,
including working capital, equipment, inventory, leasehold
improvements, and other uses approved by the department.
(b) The department shall establish by rule any exclusions
necessary to protect the integrity of the program.
§ -5 Administration; rules; contracts. (a) The
department shall administer the program and may adopt rules
pursuant to chapter 91 to implement this chapter.
(b) The department may contract with a qualified
third-party program administrator to support lender enrollment,
reserve administration, compliance monitoring, and reporting.
2026-3314 HB2583 GDI HMSO

Page 8 H.B. NO. ""
C.D. 1
§ -6 Hawaii micro-lending credit enhancement special
fund. (a) There is established in the state treasury the
Hawaii micro-lending credit enhancement special fund.
(b) The following shall be deposited into the special
fund:
(1) Moneys received from the federal government;
(2) Grants, awards, donations, gifts, transfers, or money
derived from private sources;
(3) Moneys received pursuant to the program; and
(4) Interest earned or accrued on moneys in the special
fund.
(c) Moneys in the special fund may be expended by the
department for credit enhancement, program administration, and
reporting.
§ -7 Reporting. No later than twenty days prior to the
convening of each regular session, the department shall submit a
report to the legislature that details the following:
(1) The number and dollar amount of micro-loans supported
pursuant to this chapter;
(2) The lenders participating in the program;
2026-3314 HB2583 GDI HMSO 8
linnniniiHiiiiiiiiHin

Page 9
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(3) The geographic distribution of loans under the
program;
(4) The reserve contributions, claims, and recoveries
under the program; and
(5) The estimated private capital leveraged per state
dollar under the program."
SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the Hawaii
micro-lending credit enhancement special fund the sum of
$1,500,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal
year 2026-2027 for the Hawaii micro-lending credit enhancement
program.
The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of
business, economic development, and tourism for the purposes of
this Act.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
2026-3314 HB2583 CDl HMSO

H.B. NO. 2583
I
nc
O
b
b
b
APPROVED this 6th day of July , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 2583, HD 1, SD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 2583, H.D. 1, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
188-26